src/fst/filters/downcase-derived_proper-strings.est.xfscript
# Make initial downcasing after the misnamed U.Cap.Opt
# This gives oslolaš across the board
# like Pariisi -> pariisilainen

# ---- starts here: ------

# The value of HypMinFlag depends on the configuration: if hyperminimisation is
# enabled, it will expand to a flag diacritic, if not it will be the empty string.
# This will ensure that lowercasing will work correctly for all proper strings
# independent of configuration. The alternative is to make the flag diacritic
# optional, but then a hyperminimised generator will overgenerate, producing
# an initial capital variant in addition to the lowercase string intended.
# Don't be mislead by the notation: Autoconf also uses @STRING@ notation!
define Flag       "@U.Cap.Opt@"      ;
define CmpHyph    "@U.CmpHyph.TRUE@" ;

#@IF_HFST@define HypMinFlag "@P.LEXNAME.Root@" ;

define down [ 
A -> a,
B -> b,
C -> c,
D -> d,
E -> e,
F -> f,
G -> g,
H -> h,
I -> i,
J -> j,
K -> k,
L -> l,
M -> m,
N -> n,
O -> o,
P -> p,
Q -> q,
R -> r,
S -> s,
T -> t,
U -> u,
V -> v,
W -> w,
X -> x,
Y -> y,
Z -> z,
Á -> á,
Č -> č,
Đ -> đ,
Ŋ -> ŋ,
Š -> š,
Ŧ -> ŧ,
Ž -> ž,
Õ -> õ,
Ä -> ä,
Ö -> ö,
Ü -> ü
|| FLAG _ , FLAG ?* %- _ ] 
.o. 
[ %- (->) [] || FLAG \[»]* _ ] ;     # »- indicates +Der/minus

regex down ;

# ---- ends here: ------

# The lower context fixes issue when downcasing words like Davvi-Suopma
# -> davvi-suopmelaš

# Kept for reference: The old version, i.e., 
# The Book's treatment of paloaltolainen and pariisilainen, p. 368 ff.
# Allow optional initial downcasing after @U.Cap.Opt@ 
#A (->) a, B (->) b, C (->) c, D (->) d, E (->) e, 
#F (->) f, G (->) g, H (->) h, I (->) i, J (->) j, 
#K (->) k, L (->) l, M (->) m, N (->) n, O (->) o, 
#P (->) p, Q (->) q, R (->) r, S (->) s, T (->) t, 
#U (->) u, V (->) v, W (->) w, X (->) x, Y (->) y, 
#Z (->) z, Á (->) á,
#Č (->) č, Đ (->) đ, Ŋ (->) ŋ, Š (->) š, Ŧ (->) ŧ, Ž (->) ž
#|| .#. %@U%.Cap%.Opt%@ _ 
#.o. 
# No uppercase in the middle of a downcasable word
#A->a, B->b, C->c, D->d, E->e, F->f, G->g, H->h,
#I->i, J->j, K->k, L->l, M->m, N->n, O->o, P->p,
#Q->q, R->r, S->s, T->t, U->u, V->v, W->w, X->x,
#Y->y, Z->z  || %@U%.Cap%.Opt%@ ?+ _
#.o. 
# Eliminate internal spaces inside a downcasable word 
# Spaces are indicated here with the literal 
# underscore character 
#%_  -> [] || .#. %@U%.Cap%.Opt%@ ?+ _ 

substitute defined Flag       for FLAG

#substitute defined CmpHyph    for HYPHFLAG
#substitute defined CmpFlags   for CMPFLAG
##@IF_HFST@substitute defined HypMinFlag for HYPMINFLAG
